Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1446.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Economic Development and Mixed-Use Redevelopment of Shopping Malls Act.Section 2. Findings and declaration of policy.It is determined and declared as a matter of legislative finding that there exists in this Commonwealth a number of underutilized shopping malls which PROPERTY THAT provide an economic liability to the communities in which they sit ARE LOCATED. It is in the public interest to promote redevelopment of these large parcels UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTIES and return them <--<--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819 to function in accordance with sound and approved plans for their redevelopment that will promote public safety, convenience and welfare.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Attainable housing." Any of the following:(1) A single-family residence that is subject to home attainable deed restrictions and occupied by an individual or family whose income is not more than 60% of the area median gross income.(2) A multiunit residential dwelling where at least a percentage, as defined by the municipality, of the residential units are:(i) rent-restricted; and(ii) occupied by an individual or family whose income is not more than 60% of area median income."Board." The State Planning Board established by the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929."BROWNFIELD." AN ABANDONED, IDLED OR UNDERUTILIZED INDUSTRIAL AND COMMERCIAL PROPERTY OF WHICH EXPANSION OR REDEVELOPMENT IS COMPLICATED BY THE PRESENCE OR POTENTIAL PRESENCE OF ENVIRONMENTAL CONTAMINATION."Committee." The Economic Development and Mixed-Use Redevelopment Advisory Committee established by the board under section 4."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.20250HB1446PN2024 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Developer." A taxpayer redeveloping a shopping mall AN UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY for economic development and mixed-use redevelopment purposes."Economic development." Creating the conditions for economic growth and improved quality of life by expanding the capacity of individuals, businesses and communities to maximize the use of their talents and skills to support innovation, job creation and private investment."Economic development and mixed-use redevelopment." An urban, suburban, village development or single building that combines residential, commercial, cultural, institutional or industrial uses to provide efficiency for the community in terms of space, transportation and economic development."GREYFIELD." A PROPERTY WITH COMMERCIAL DEVELOPMENT AND PUBLIC UTILITIES THAT HAVE BECOME ABANDONED, IDLED OR UNDERUTILIZED."Local taxing authority." A county, municipal corporation, institution district or school district having authority to levy real estate taxes."Municipal corporation." A city, borough, incorporated town or township."Project agreement." An agreement between a developer and a local taxing authority stating the terms and conditions of the redevelopment of a shopping mall AN UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY authorized by the local taxing authority for a tax exemption or special tax provision under section 5."Property maintenance code." A municipal ordinance that regulates the maintenance or development of real property. The term includes a building code, zoning code, housing code and public safety code.20250HB1446PN2024 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Real estate tax." A tax on a homestead imposed or authorized to be imposed by a local taxing authority."Redevelopment." Repair, construction or reconstruction, including alterations and additions, having the effect of rehabilitating a shopping mall AN UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY so that the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY attains higher standards of safety, health, economic use or amenity or is brought into compliance with laws, ordinances or regulations governing safety, health, economic use or amenity standards. The term shall not include ordinary upkeep and maintenance."Serious violation." A violation of a State law or a property maintenance code that poses an immediate imminent threat to the health and safety of a dwelling occupant, occupants in surrounding structures or passersby."Shopping mall." A large building or series of connected buildings containing a variety of stores for the purpose of retail, food service or recreation. The term includes A shopping plazas PLAZA, shopping centers CENTER and mini malls MALL."Special tax provision." The refund or forgiveness of a portion of a taxpayer's real estate tax liability as provided by this act."UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY." ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) A BROWNFIELD.(2) A GREYFIELD.(3) A SHOPPING MALL.Section 4. Economic Development and Mixed-Use Redevelopment Advisory Committee.(a) Establishment.--The board shall establish the Economic Development and Mixed-Use Redevelopment Advisory Committee for the purpose of providing municipal corporations with guidance 20250HB1446PN2024 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and best practices for the redevelopment of shopping malls UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTIES into attainable housing and other mixed-use spaces for the benefit of the community.(b) Composition.--(1) The committee shall be composed of members with expertise in areas, including:(i) Real estate development.(ii) Municipal planning.(iii) Economic development.(iv) Land use planning.(2) The committee shall include a member of a Statewide trade association of real estate professionals involved in all aspects of the residential and commercial real estate industry.(c) Guidelines.--The committee shall draft best practices guidelines for the redevelopment of shopping malls UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTIES based on national standards and models. The guidelines shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website within six months of the effective date of this subsection.Section 5. Authority to provide special tax provisions.(a) Construction.--This act shall be construed to authorize local taxing authorities to provide special tax provisions related to an increase in the value of real estate resulting from the redevelopment of shopping malls UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTIES within the boundaries of the local taxing authority, implementing section 2(b)(iii) of Article VIII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania.(b) Approval required.--A tax exemption or special tax provision authorized under this act is not enforceable until the 20250HB1446PN2024 - 5 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 governing body of any one local taxing authority with jurisdiction to levy real estate taxes on a property has approved an ordinance or resolution adopting the tax exemption or special tax provision. Other local taxing authorities may approve a tax exemption or special tax provision subsequently.(c) Notice.--(1) Upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution adopting the tax exemption or special tax provision under subsection (a), each local taxing authority must post a notice of the approval in a newspaper of general circulation in the area. A local taxing authority may also post the notice on its publicly accessible Internet website, if the local taxing authority possesses a publicly accessible Internet website.(2) If multiple local taxing authorities have mutual jurisdiction to levy real estate taxes on a property, a joint notice of implementation of the tax exemption or special tax provision must be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the area upon adoption by each local taxing authority with mutual jurisdiction to levy real estate taxes on the property and each local taxing authority must post a notice of the adoption on its publicly accessible Internet website, if the local taxing authority possesses a publicly accessible Internet website.Section 6. Exemption schedule.(a) Tax exemption on assessment.--A local taxing authority granting a tax exemption under this act may provide for a tax exemption on the assessment attributable to the actual cost of the redevelopment of shopping malls UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTIES or up to a maximum cost uniformly established by the municipal corporation. The maximum cost must uniformly apply within the 20250HB1446PN2024 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 local taxing authority's jurisdiction.(b) Schedule.--Notwithstanding if an assessment eligible for exemption is based upon actual cost or a maximum cost, the actual amount of taxes exempt must be in accordance with at least one of the following schedules, as determined by the local taxing authority:(1) For the first 10 years, 100% of the eligible assessment is exempt for economic development and mixed-use redevelopment.(2) For any economic development and mixed-use redevelopment that is approved by the municipal corporation in which the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY is located, 100% of the eligible assessment shall be exempt for an additional two years if at least one of the following criteria is met to the satisfaction of and by a date established by the local taxing authority, and 100% of the eligible assessment shall be exempt for an additional five years if at least two of the following criteria are met to the satisfaction of and by a date established by the local taxing authority:(i) A minimum amount of attainable housing as defined and determined by the local taxing authority granting the exemption in consultation with the local planning authority.(ii) Improved energy efficiency.(iii) Installation of a renewable energy system that provides electricity for 50% of the average electricity needs for the economic development and mixed-use redevelopment.(iv) Creation of greener or open space.20250HB1446PN2024 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Creation of lifestyle improvement projects, including outdoor recreation space, walking paths, bicycle paths or farmers markets.(vi) Installation of charging stations for electric vehicles.(vii) Access to public transit.(viii) The redevelopment of the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY is subject to a project labor agreement.(c) Sale or exchange.--A tax exemption authorized by an ordinance or resolution adopted under this act is specific to real property of the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY and shall not terminate upon the sale or exchange of the property.(d) Estimate.--A local taxing authority must provide upon request and within 30 days an estimate of the amount of assessment exempted for each eligible property based on the exemption schedule under subsection (b).(e) Repayment.--(1) A local taxing authority shall receive a return of the local taxing authority's proportional share of taxes exempt under this act if, within five years following the redevelopment of the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY, the following occur:(i) a serious violation of State law or a property maintenance code exists on the property and the owner has taken no substantial steps to correct the violation within six months following notification of the violation and for which fines or other penalties or a judgment to abate or correct were imposed by a magisterial district judge at law or in equity, not subject to appellate 20250HB1446PN2024 - 8 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 review, or imposed by a court of common pleas; or(ii) the developer is subject to a municipal permit denial under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to neighborhood blight reclamation and revitalization) in connection with the redevelopment of the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY.(2) At the time a project agreement is executed, if the developer has not completed each requirement for exemption under section 8(a) or is ineligible under section 8(b) or (c), the local taxing authority shall file a lien against the tax-exempt property at the rate of the estimated amount of assessment under subsection (d). The lien shall be satisfied by the local taxing authority at the end of the fifth year following the completion of the redevelopment if there have been no serious violations against the property that have not been corrected to the satisfaction of the local taxing authority. The lien on the property remains under subsection (c) upon the sale or exchange of the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY.Section 7. Exemption incentives procedure.(a) Notification.--A developer desiring tax exemption for the redeveloped property as authorized by an ordinance or resolution adopted under this act must notify the local taxing authority granting the exemption in writing on an application form provided by the local taxing authority, which must be submitted at the time the developer secures the building permit or, if no building permit or other notification is required for the redevelopment of the property, at the time the developer commences construction. The application must include the following information:20250HB1446PN2024 - 9 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A notarized statement of tax obligations, signed by the applicant and the local taxing authority.(2) An outline of specifications for the redevelopment of the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY indicating, with as much specificity as practicable, the materials to be used for exterior and interior finishes.(3) An itemized cost estimate for the redevelopment of the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY. The itemization must:(i) be on contractor letterhead; and(ii) indicate the property address of the redevelopment project.(4) A preliminary architectural drawing or blueprint for the redevelopment.(5) A recent appraisal of the property, if available.(6) An applicable building permit application or building permit.(7) An income and expense report for the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY, which may be submitted directly to the county assessment office in order to protect the confidentiality of the information.(8) The final decision of the zoning authority or other regulatory agency granting relief, if applicable.(9) The signature of the applicant and the date of signing.(10) Proof of a project labor agreement for the redevelopment, if applicable.(b) Estimate.--The amount of assessment deemed eligible for tax exemption under subsection (c) shall be available for public inspection and copying so that a subsequent purchaser may be 20250HB1446PN2024 - 10 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 informed of the amount of taxes to be paid after the exemption expires.(c) County assessment office.--(1) A copy of the application submitted under subsection (a) shall be forwarded to the county assessment office. After completion of the redevelopment of the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY, the county assessment office shall:(i) Separately assess the redevelopment and calculate the amounts of the assessment eligible for tax exemption in accordance with the limits established by the local taxing authorities.(ii) Notify the developer and the local taxing authorities of the reassessment and amounts of the assessment eligible for exemption.(2) Appeals from a reassessment and the amounts eligible for the exemption may be made by the developer or the local taxing authorities.(d) Amendment of ordinance or resolution.--The cost of redevelopment to be exempt and the schedule of taxes exempt that exist at the time of the initial request for tax exemption must apply to the exemption request. A subsequent amendment to the ordinance or resolution does not apply to a request initiated prior to adoption of the amendment.Section 8. Eligibility requirements.(a) Compliance.--The completed redevelopment must:(1) Conform to zoning ordinance requirements.(2) Correct any municipal code violation.(b) Ineligibility.--A property is deemed ineligible for tax exemption under section 7(a) if any of the following apply:(1) The property receives other property tax abatement 20250HB1446PN2024 - 11 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or exemption incentives for new construction or improvement.(2) The property receives tax relief through a State program.(3) The property owner or developer is delinquent on property taxes related to the subject property, unless the delinquent taxes are paid prior to redevelopment, or payment of delinquent taxes has been arranged with the local taxing authority in accordance with an installment plan.(4) The property owner has a legal or equitable interest in other property for which taxes are delinquent, unless the delinquent taxes are paid prior to redevelopment, or payment of delinquent taxes has been arranged with the local taxing authority in accordance with an installment plan.(5) The property owner has a legal or equitable interest in other property within the boundaries of the municipal corporation for which there exists a serious violation that has not been remedied prior to filing the application under section 7.(6) Construction or other improvements for the redevelopment of the shopping mall UNDERUTILIZED PROPERTY has commenced prior to filing an application under section 7.(c) Prohibitions.--For the period of time that a AN UNDERUTILIZED property receives tax exemption under this act, a purchase or sale of the UNDERUTILIZED property or a portion of the UNDERUTILIZED property may not be structured to exclude or exempt the transaction from a realty transfer tax due to a taxing authority that would not be excluded or exempt, except for the following:(1) A sheriff sale or tax claim bureau sale.(2) A corrective deed.20250HB1446PN2024 - 12 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A transfer by a mortgagor to the holder of a bona fide mortgage in default in lieu of a foreclosure.(4) A transfer to a judicial sale in which the successful bidder is the bona fide holder of a mortgage.(5) A transaction excluded from the realty transfer tax under Article XI-C of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1446PN2024 - 13 - 123456789